California, session 20252026, SB319.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 13156 is added to the Penal Code, to read:13156. (a) (1) The Commencing January 1, 2026, the Department of Justice shall collect every data element in this subdivision. Commencing March 1, 2026, and January 1 each year thereafter beginning in 2027, the Department of Justice shall publish annual statistical reports providing monthly information for each county related to convictions of Section 666.1 of this code and Section 11395 of the Health and Safety Code as they pertain to all of the following:(A) By month, the number of people convicted of violations of Section 666.1 of this code and Section 11395 of the Health and Safety Code and, for each conviction, whether the conviction was classified as a misdemeanor or a felony.(B) By month, the number of people convicted of a violation of Section 666.1 with a prior conviction for a violation of Section 666.1.(C) By month, the number of people convicted of a violation of Section 11395 of the Health and Safety Code with a prior conviction for a violation of Section 11395 of the Health and Safety Code.(D) For each conviction of Section 666.1 of this code and Section 11395 of the Health and Safety Code, the number of people convicted who had two or more convictions for offenses referred to in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 666.1 and subdivision (c) of Section 11395 of the Health and Safety Code in the last year, the last 3 years, the last 5 years, the last 10 years, and the last 20 years.(E) For each conviction of Section 666.1 of this code and Section 11395 of the Health and Safety Code, by month, the number of people with 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, and 10 or more prior convictions.(2) The department shall post the information submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) on its internet website.(b) (1) Every Commencing January 1, 2026, every county shall submit to the Department of Justice the following data and information that shall be submitted in a form, manner, and in accordance with timelines prescribed by the department:(A) The county’s annual allocation and expenditure of state and federal funds on sheriff, probation, and court activities, by category and specific grant program, including any reimbursements.(B) The amount of annual and cumulative unspent state and federal funds in accounts related to sheriff, probation, and court activities, including funds in a reserve account, by category and specific grant program, including any reimbursements.(C) The county’s annual expenditure of county general funds and other funds, by category, on sheriff, probation, and court activities.(D) The fund sources and amounts spent annually as the nonfederal share for Medi-Cal, including specialty mental health services and substance use disorder treatment services, by category.(E) All administrative costs associated with sheriff, probation probation, and court activities, by category.(F) All contracted sheriff, probation, and court services, and the cost of those contracted services, by category.(2) The Commencing January 1, 2027, the department shall post the information received pursuant to paragraph (1) on its internet website.(c) (1) For Commencing January 1, 2026, for each person charged with an offense under Section 666.1 and for each person charged with an offense under Section 11395 of the Health and Safety Code, each superior court shall submit all of the following metrics to the Judicial Council:(A) By month, the number of people diverted to a program pursuant to Section 11395 of the Health and Safety Code, program, disaggregated by race and gender.(B) The average daily enrollment in those programs, disaggregated by race and gender.(C) By month, the number of people discharged from those programs, disaggregated by race, gender, and type of discharge, including, but not limited to, successful completion or unsuccessful termination. For unsuccessful terminations, the report shall indicate the reason for termination, including, but not limited to, not benefitting from treatment, not amenable to treatment, refused treatment, or convicted of a crime committed after treatment started.(D) By month, the number of people who received services billed to Medi-Cal that were ordered or related to their involvement in a program described in subdivision (a), and the types of services or benefits received in a manner consistent with Current Procedural Terminology or the Healthcare Common Procedure Coding System, disaggregated by race and gender.(E) The number of people who received services billed to Medi-Cal or private payees not billed to Medi-Cal that were ordered or related to their involvement in a program described in subdivision (a) subparagraph (A) and the types of services or benefits received in a manner consistent with Current Procedural Terminology or the Healthcare Common Procedure Coding System, disaggregated by race, gender, and payee.(F) The total number of treatment hours billed to Medi-Cal for all participants in programs described in subdivision (a), disaggregated by service description, provider type, and procedure code, and the source of funds for the nonfederal share of Medi-Cal.(G) The mental health or substance use disorder diagnosis, or both, for individuals diverted to a program.(H)The outcome of judicial review proceedings mandated by subdivision (c) of Section 666.1 and subdivision (f) of Section 11395 of the Health and Safety Code.(2) Commencing January 1, 2026, for each person charged with an offense under Section 666.1 and for each person charged with an offense under Section 11395 of the Health and Safety Code, each superior court shall submit to Judicial Council the outcomes of judicial review proceedings mandated by subdivision (c) of Section 666.1 and subdivision (f) of Section 11395 of the Health and Safety Code, disaggregated by race and gender. (2)The(3) Commencing January 1, 2027, the Judicial Council shall publish an annual report containing the metrics in subparagraphs (A) to (H), (G), inclusive, of paragraph (1) and the information received pursuant to paragraph (2) on its internet website.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.